North Dakota, session 69, HB1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 34-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Unauthorized workers - Prohibition - Penalty.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Business license" means a license, permit, registration, or other authorization
required by law for a business to operate in the state.
b. "Private employer" means a person transacting business in the state, which
employs one or more individuals.
c. "Unauthorized worker" means an unauthorized alien as defined by 8 U.S.C.
Section 1324a(h)(3).
2. A private employer may not willfully hire for employment an unauthorized worker or
continue to employ an individua l who has become an unauthorized worker .
3. An alleged violation under this section may be filed by an individual with the attorney
general and the attorney general may investigate the alleged violation. An alleged
violation may be referred by the attorney general for prosecution .
4. A person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed:
a. Two thousand dollars if it is the person's first offense under this section .
b. Five thousand dollars if it is the person's second offense under this section .
Page No. 1 25.0654.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Ten thousand dollars if it is the person's third or subsequent offense under this
section.
Page No. 2 25.0654.02000